Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-952
Methods.

It shall be the duty of every person to control the spread of noxious weeds on lands owned or controlled by him or her and to use such methods for that purpose as are specified in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director.

Laws 1965, c. 7, § 1, p. 78;

Laws 1975, LB 14, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 49, § 4.